Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1696.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 3, 1959 (P.L.1688, No.621), known as the Housing Finance Agency Law, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE IV-EPENNSYLVANIA LEASE WITH GUARANTEED PURCHASE OPTION HOME OWNERSHIP PROGRAMSection 401-E. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advertisement." A written, visual or oral communication made to a lessee or prospective lessee by means of personal representation, newspaper, magazine, circular, billboard, direct mailing, sign, radio, television, telephone or other means of communication that aids, promotes or assists, directly or indirectly, a lease with guaranteed purchase option agreement."Escrow account." A bank account or other financial account administered by the agency or its designee in which all funds paid by lessees toward the closing costs and down payment to purchase the subject premises and any and all matching program funds are deposited and maintained unless paid directly to the title company at closing."Fund." The Pennsylvania Lease with Guaranteed Purchase Option Home Ownership Program Fund established in section 406-E."Lease with g uaranteed purchase option agreement" or "agreement." An agreement for the use of real property by an 20250HB1696PN2086 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 individual primarily for personal, family or household purposes for an initial period of not less than one year that is automatically renewable for successive one-year periods and that provides for a guaranteed option for the lessee to purchase the property. The term does not include an agreement for agricultural, business or commercial purposes or an agreement in which the individual that will use the property is an organization."Lessee." An individual who leases real property in accordance with a lease with guaranteed purchase option agreement."Lessor." A person or entity that owns residential property:(1) constructed or rehabilitated under the program; and(2) to be leased with a guaranteed option to purchase to an eligible lessee."Monthly payment." The total amount due under a lease with guaranteed purchase option agreement that is attributable to rent and an amount escrowed for the purchase of the property, and which agreement provides that the escrowed amount is not less than 20% of the monthly payment."Program." The Pennsylvania Lease with Guaranteed Purchase Option Home Ownership Program established in section 402-E."Program funds." All money appropriated by the General Assembly for the purpose of awarding grants or loans under the program, including money from sources other than the Commonwealth that are provided for the program."Purchase price." The purchase price of the subject property, as stated in a lease with guaranteed purchase option agreement, which is equal to the actual market value of the property on the date of the agreement, as determined in a real 20250HB1696PN2086 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 estate appraisal report provided by a certified residential real estate appraiser who is mutually agreed to by the lessor and lessee. The lessor shall pay the cost of the appraisal. In the event the lessor and lessee cannot agree upon an appraiser, each shall select an appraiser to produce an appraisal report, with each bearing their own costs for the report, and the purchase price shall be equal to the average of the values determined in the two appraisal reports.Section 402-E. Establishment.The Pennsylvania Lease with Guaranteed Purchase Option Home Ownership Program is established and shall be administered by the agency. The program shall be dependent on the availability of program funds.Section 403-E. Structure of program.(a) Project types.--The program may provide funding for sustainable home ownership rehabilitation located in distressed and disinvested census tracts in order to provide decent, safe and sanitary dwellings for lease with a guaranteed purchase option to an individual whose household income is at or below 80% of the area median income for the metropolitan area determined by the Department of Housing and Urban Development.(b) Use of program funds.--Program funds for projects under subsection (a) may be used for the following:(1) Predevelopment activities, including title searches, market studies, project planning, architectural services, legal and engineering studies and related fees.(2) Acquisition and disposition of real property.(3) Site preparation, including demolition of existing structures, improvements and infrastructure.(4) Rehabilitation and construction.20250HB1696PN2086 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Matching funds for the lessee's escrow account.(c) Affordable housing matching funds.--Program funds may be used as a set aside for matching funds for counties that have established optional county affordable housing funds under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 60 (relating to optional affordable housing funding). To receive matching funds under this subsection, a county must annually report detailed information as required by the agency on the use of the optional affordable housing funds for county projects. The information shall be included in the agency's report under section 405-E.(d) Mandatory preferences.--To the extent possible, the agency shall adopt written policies to give preference to projects that utilize properties from inventories maintained by public entities, including municipalities, land banks and redevelopment agencies.(e) Discretionary preferences.--The agency may adopt written policies to give preference to projects, including, but not limited to, projects that:(1) Meet weatherization standards promulgated by the agency.(2) Meet energy efficiency standards promulgated by the agency.(3) Are accessible to people with physical disabilities.(f) Considerations.--The agency shall take into consideration geographical distribution of program funds to ensure that all areas of this Commonwealth participate to the greatest extent possible.(g) Allocation.--The agency shall allocate at least 30% of program funds for housing projects that benefit households with household incomes that are less than 50% of the area median 20250HB1696PN2086 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 income for the metropolitan area as determined by the Department of Housing and Urban Development. To better assist households below 50% of the area median income, the agency shall prioritize lessees in a Housing Choice Vouchers Homeownership Program under Federal law.(h) Monitoring and compliance.--The agency shall develop and implement criteria for monitoring compliance with program requirements.Section 404-E. Plan.(a) Duty to adopt.--Within 90 days of the effective date of this subsection and by March 15 of each year thereafter, the agency shall adopt a plan that specifies the method by which program funds will be distributed and administered that year.(b) Publication and posting.--(1) The agency shall submit the proposed plan, including a comment response document to be produced as part of the public comment process, to the chair and minority chair of the Urban Affairs and Housing Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Housing and Community Development Committee of the House of Representatives, and to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin, and shall post the proposed plan on the agency's publicly accessible Internet website for public comment no later than 45 days prior to adoption of the proposed plan under subsection (a).(2) All comments submitted to the agency in writing are public records accessible for inspection and duplication in accordance with the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, and the agency shall incorporate the comments into the comment response document.20250HB1696PN2086 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 405-E. Reporting.(a) Duty of agency.--Within 90 days following the close of the first calendar year after the effective date of this subsection and by July 1 of every year thereafter, the agency shall issue a report containing a financial statement, an itemized list of projects funded, demographic data, including gender, disability, number of children in the household and race and ethnicity and income of the individuals and communities served, and a description of other expenditures in the preceding year. The agency shall submit the report to the Governor, the Auditor General, the chair and minority chair of the Urban Affairs and Housing Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Housing and Community Development Committee of the House of Representatives and shall post the report on the agency's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Public record.--The report shall be a public record accessible for inspection and duplication in accordance with the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.Section 406-E. Pennsylvania Lease with Guaranteed Purchase Option Home Ownership Program Fund.The Pennsylvania Lease with Guaranteed Purchase Option Home Ownership Program Fund is established in the State Treasury. Interest and earnings of the fund shall remain in the fund. All program funds shall be deposited into the fund. The money in the fund and interest accruing thereon is appropriated to the agency on a continuing basis to carry out the provisions of this article.Section 407-E. Funding.Implementation of this article shall be contingent upon 20250HB1696PN2086 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sufficient program funds being deposited into the fund in accordance with section 406-E to carry out the purposes of this article. In a year in which there are insufficient program funds in the fund for the purposes outlined in this article, the program shall be suspended until program funds exist in sufficient amount.Section 408-E. Disclosures required in connection with lease with guaranteed purchase option agreement.(a) Duty of lessor.--A lessor shall comply with any and all local occupancy or other requirements applicable to rental dwellings and disclose to the lessee all of the following in a clear and conspicuous manner:(1) A brief description of the leased property, sufficient to identify the property to the lessor and lessee.(2) The total amount of all payments due under the agreement, including:(i) The total amount of the monthly payment due under the agreement, to be applied toward rent.(ii) The total amount of the monthly payment due under the agreement, to be applied toward the escrow account.(iii) The total amount of each payment due under the agreement for utilities that are provided by the lessor, if not included in the lease payment.(iv) Any security deposit to be collected by the lessor and escrowed in accordance with sections 511.1 and 511.2 of the act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951.(v) Any other charges, individually itemized, payable by the lessee to the lessor.20250HB1696PN2086 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The timing of lease payments.(4) The right of the lessee to reinstate as provided in section 411-E.(5) The name and contact information of any property manager acting as agent for the lessor for the rental and management of the property.(6) The condition upon which the lessee or lessor may terminate the lease.(7) The guaranteed option of the lessee to purchase the leased property.(8) The purchase price of the real property that is the subject of the agreement.(9) A statement as to whether any contractor or third-party warranties on appliances and installed equipment, roof or other improvements to the leased property will be transferred to the lessor or lessee in the event the lessee purchases the property.(10) A statement that the lessee is not required to purchase insurance for the property, although the lessee is advised to purchase renter's insurance.(11) A notice in a prominent place in at least 12-point type or in legible print with letters at least one-eighth inch in size, in substantially the following form:NOTICE: THIS LEASE with GUARANTEED PURCHASE OPTION AGREEMENT IS REGULATED BY STATE LAW AND MAY BE ENFORCED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR BY PRIVATE LEGAL ACTION.(b) Lease to be written.--A lease with guaranteed purchase option agreement shall be in writing and the information required by this section shall be disclosed by the lessor prior 20250HB1696PN2086 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to execution of the agreement and shall be disclosed either in the agreement or on a dated, executed document that identifies the lease with guaranteed purchase option agreement and the parties to it.(c) Requirements for disclosures.--Except as provided in subsection (a)(11), the information required to be disclosed by this section shall be printed or typed in at least 12-point bold face type and numerical amounts and percentages shall be stated in figures. All information required by this section shall be stated in plain language, using words and phrases of common meaning. The information shall be appropriately divided and captioned by its sections.(d) Disclosure of additional information.--A lessor may disclose information that is not required by this section if the additional information is not stated, used or placed in a manner that will contradict, obscure or distract attention from the required information.Section 409-E. Prohibited terms.A lessor may not require any of the following from the lessee:(1) The purchase of insurance.(2) Any payment in addition to the lease payments specified in the agreement other than the payment described in section 412-E that is required for the lessee to acquire ownership of the leased property.(3) Lease payments that in the aggregate exceed the maximum amount specified in section 416-E.(4) A penalty for early termination of the agreement.(5) A fee for collection of a lease payment.(6) Any requirement for mandatory arbitration to resolve 20250HB1696PN2086 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disputes pertaining to the agreement.Section 410-E. Protections against eviction.(a) Reasons for termination or nonrenewal of agreement.--A lessor may terminate or refuse to renew the agreement or may evict a lessee and dwelling occupants only for one of the following reasons:(1) Nonpayment of rent, after notice of default and failure to cure as provided under this article.(2) A second or subsequent material violation of the agreement occurring within a six-month period when the violation has not been remedied within 30 days of receipt of written notice of the violation.(b) Eviction procedure.--A lessor may only commence an action in eviction in accordance with the following procedure:(1) Prior to the commencement of the eviction proceeding or the termination of or failure to renew the agreement and after the expiration of the grace period required by section 411-E(c), the lessor shall notify the lessee in writing of the particular breach or violation of the lease by certified or registered mail.(2) In the case of nonpayment of rent, the notice shall state that an eviction proceeding may be commenced if:(i) the lessee does not pay the overdue rent within 20 days from the date of service if the notice is given on or after April 1 and before September 1 and 30 days if given on or after September 1 and before April 1; or(ii) an additional nonpayment of rent occurs within six months of the giving of the notice, in which case the landlord may commence an immediate eviction proceeding.(3) In the case of a breach of the agreement other than 20250HB1696PN2086 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonpayment of rent, the notice shall describe the particular breach or violation and provide an opportunity to cure within 30 days.(4) An eviction action may not be commenced and the lessor may not terminate or refuse to renew the agreement unless the lessee has been notified as required by this section. Upon a second or subsequent material violation or breach occurring within six months of an unremedied material violation or breach, the lessor may commence eviction proceedings at any time within 60 days of the last violation or breach.(c) Eviction diversion program.--Prior to the commencement of an eviction proceeding, the lessor shall utilize at least one eviction diversion program if any such program is available in the jurisdiction. If the lessee initiates utilization of an eviction diversion program, the lessor must participate.(d) Compliance with other law.--Any lease termination, refusal to renew a lease or eviction by a lessor shall comply with all other applicable Federal, State and local laws.Section 411-E. Reinstatement of agreement after default.(a) Right of lessee.--A lessee whose agreement has been terminated for failure to make timely payments has the right to reinstate the original agreement, within six months of the lease termination, without losing any right or option previously acquired under the agreement if the leased premises is vacant and habitable at the time of reinstatement.(b) Payments, charges and fees permitted.--Before reinstating an agreement, the lessor may require the lessee to pay any unpaid lease payments.(c) Grace period.--A lessor shall allow a lessee a grace 20250HB1696PN2086 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 period of not less than 15 days before the lessee is determined to be in breach of the lease for nonpayment of rent or any other violation of the lease. No lessee shall be entitled to more than three grace periods per year.Section 412-E. Acquiring ownership.(a) Right of lessee.--The lessee may exercise the option to purchase the leased property and use the escrow funds for the purchase if:(1) the lessee has obtained a loan preapproval or commitment from a financial institution to purchase the home; or(2) the lessee has otherwise satisfied the terms of the agreement for exercising the option to purchase.(b) Agreement.--The agreement shall be based on the standard agreement described in section 417-E(a).(c) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the lessee from exercising the option to purchase the leased property prior to any dates specified in the agreement within which the option may be exercised.Section 413-E. Advertisements and mandatory information to be supplied.(a) Prohibited advertisements.--An advertisement for a lease with guaranteed purchase option agreement may not state that:(1) A lease of any specific property is available at specific amounts or on specific terms unless the lessor will lease the property at those amounts or on those terms.(2) A payment or a lease payment is due upon origination of a lease without disclosing all of the following:(i) The payment due upon origination of the lease.(ii) The lease payment.20250HB1696PN2086 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The total number of lease payments necessary to obtain ownership of the property that is the subject of the agreement.(b) Amounts required.--All property offered under a lease with guaranteed purchase option agreement shall include all of the following:(1) The purchase price of the property.(2) The amount of the monthly payment.(3) The amount of the monthly payment that will be deposited into the lessee's escrow account for use in purchasing the property.(4) The total number of lease payments necessary to acquire ownership of the property that is the subject of the lease with guaranteed purchase option agreement.Section 414-E. Liability of lessor for noncompliance.(a) Extent of liability.--A lessor who fails to comply with the requirements of this article with respect to a lease with guaranteed purchase option agreement is subject to any remedy available under contract law and, in addition, is liable to the lessee in an amount equal to the sum of the following:(1) The costs of the action and reasonable attorney fees as determined by a court.(2) The greater of the following:(i) The actual damages sustained by the lessee because of the failure of the lessor.(ii) Twenty-five percent of the total amount necessary to acquire ownership of the property that is the subject of the lease with guaranteed purchase option agreement.(b) Single recovery.--If a particular lease with guaranteed 20250HB1696PN2086 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purchase option agreement has more than one lessee, only one recovery of damages is allowed under subsection (a)(2) for a violation of this article. Multiple violations in connection with an agreement shall entitle the lessee or multiple lessees to only one recovery under this section.(c) When offset prohibited.--(1) A lessee may not take action to offset an amount for which a lessor is potentially liable under subsection (a)(2) against an amount owed by the lessee, unless the amount of the liability of the lessor has been determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in an action in which the lessor was a party.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not be construed to bar a lessee in default on an obligation arising from the agreement from asserting a violation of this article in an original action or as a defense or counterclaim to an action brought by the lessor to collect amounts owed by the lessee under the agreement.Section 415-E. Eligible lessees.The program shall be limited to households that have incomes equal to or less than 80% of the area median income for the metropolitan area as determined by the Department of Housing and Urban Development.Section 416-E. Maximum allowable monthly payments.The agency shall determine maximum allowable monthly payments under a lease with guaranteed purchase agreement, which shall not exceed 110% of the fair market rent for the county in which the property is located, as published by the Department of Housing and Urban Development in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 1437a(b)(2) (relating to rental payments). Not less than 20% of 20250HB1696PN2086 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the monthly payment shall be designated for escrow on the lessee's behalf to be used for the purchase of the property. The remainder of the monthly payment shall be transmitted to the lessor as rent.Section 417-E. Standard lease agreement.(a) Duty of agency.--The agency shall develop a standard lease agreement for all lessees and lessors participating in the program, including the following components:(1) The maximum number of years the lessee may lease the property without exercising the lessee's option to purchase under the terms of the agreement, which shall not be less than 10 years. The agreement shall specify that the lessee may, at the lessee's discretion, exercise the option to purchase sooner than the maximum time period. Upon the request of the lessee, the agency shall provide assistance to the lessee in obtaining financing to purchase the property through the agency's Statewide network of mortgage lenders and brokers.(2) The amount of each monthly rental payment to be deposited into an interest-bearing escrow account and to be used towards the purchase of the home.(3) A provision that the lessor shall apply for any real estate tax abatement available in the jurisdiction in which the property is situated. The monthly payment shall be set as if no abatement is in place. The portion of the monthly payment attributed to the difference between the abated taxes and the unabated taxes shall be deposited into the escrow account for the benefit of the lessee and shall be counted toward the match described in subsection (b).(4) A requirement that all lessees participate in home 20250HB1696PN2086 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ownership counseling through the agency's Housing Counseling network at no cost to the lessee prior to exercising the option to purchase.(5) A provision that the lease constitutes a traditional landlord and tenant agreement with the landlord remaining responsible for all traditional maintenance and financial costs associated with the property, except utilities or specific obligations, such as snow removal, which the lease clearly specifies are to be paid by the lessee.(6) A provision stating that any other agreement or contractual obligation between the parties must be in writing.(b) Matching funds.--The agency shall deposit into the escrow account amounts from the fund to match the lessee's deposits on a 1:1 basis. The matching funds shall be deposited with the same frequency as the lessee's deposits to the escrow account.Section 418-E. Escrow accounts.The agency shall specify the type of account in which escrow deposits are to be maintained, including the following:(1) The specific accounting of each lessee's escrowed funds, if separate accounts are not maintained for each lessee in the program.(2) The process for handling of escrow accounts in instances of eviction for nonpayment and damages to property.(3) A provision stating that any remaining escrow amount deposited by a lessee who defaults under, or chooses to terminate, the agreement shall revert to the lessee.Section 419-E. Exemption from realty transfer tax.A transfer of real property to a lessee from a lessor under 20250HB1696PN2086 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the program shall be exempt from both the State and local realty transfer tax under Articles XI-C and XI-D of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, and section 301.1 of the act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), known as The Local Tax Enabling Act.Section 420-E. Guidelines.Within 180 days of the effective date of this section, the agency shall establish guidelines to carry out the provisions of this article.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB1696PN2086 - 18 - 12345678910